Utah statutes.
78B-8-402.   Petition -- Disease testing -- Notice -- Payment for testing.
(1)  An emergency medical services provider, or first aid volunteer who is
significantly exposed during the course of performing the emergency medical
services provider's duties or during the course of performing emergency
assistance or first aid may:
(a)  request that the person to whom he was significantly exposed voluntarily
submit to testing; or
(b)  petition the district court for an order requiring that the person to
whom he was significantly exposed submit to testing to determine the presence
of a disease, as defined in Section 78B-8-401, and that the results of that
test be disclosed to the petitioner by the Department of Health.
(2) (a)  The petitioner shall file a petition with the district court seeking
an order to submit to testing and to disclose the results in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
(b)  The petition shall be sealed upon filing and made accessible only to the
petitioner, the subject of the petition, and their attorneys, upon court
order.
(3) (a)  The petition described in Subsection (2) shall be accompanied by an
affidavit in which the emergency medical services provider or first aid
volunteer certifies that he has been significantly exposed to the individual
who is the subject of the petition and describes that exposure.
(b)  The petitioner shall submit to testing to determine the presence of a
disease, when the petition is filed or within three days after the petition is
filed.
(4)  The petitioner shall cause the petition required under this section to be
served on the person who the petitioner is requesting to be tested in a manner
that will best preserve the confidentiality of that person.
(5) (a)  The court shall set a time for a hearing on the matter within 10 days
after the petition is filed and shall give the petitioner and the individual
who is the subject of the petition notice of the hearing at least 72 hours
prior to the hearing.
(b)  The individual who is the subject of the petition shall also be notified
that he may have an attorney present at the hearing, and that his attorney may
examine and cross-examine witnesses.
(c)  The hearing shall be conducted in camera.
(6)  The district court may enter an order requiring that an individual submit
to testing for a disease if the court finds probable cause to believe:
(a)  the petitioner was significantly exposed; and
(b)  the exposure occurred during the course of the emergency medical services
provider's duties, or the provision of emergency assistance or first aid by a
first aid volunteer.
(7)  The court may order that additional, follow-up testing be conducted, and
that the individual submit to that testing, as it determines to be necessary
and appropriate.
(8)  The court is not required to order an individual to submit to a test
under this section if it finds that there is a substantial reason, relating to
the life or health of the individual, not to enter the order.
(9) (a)  Upon order of the district court that a person submit to testing for
a disease, that person shall report to the designated local health department
to have his blood drawn within 10 days from the issuance of the order, and
thereafter as designated by the court, or be held in contempt of court.
(b)  The court shall send the order to the Department of Health and to the
local health department ordered to draw the blood.
(c)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 26-6-27, the Department of
Health and a local health department may disclose the test results pursuant to
a court order as provided in this section.
(d)  Under this section, anonymous testing as provided under Section 26-6-3.5
shall not satisfy the requirements of the court order.
(10)  The local health department or the Department of Health shall inform the
subject of the petition and the petitioner of the results of the test and
advise both parties that the test results are confidential.  That information
shall be maintained as confidential by all parties to the action.
(11)  The court, its personnel, the process server, the Department of Health,
local health department, and petitioner shall maintain confidentiality of the
name and any other identifying information regarding the individual tested and
the results of the test as they relate to that individual, except as
specifically authorized by this chapter.
(12) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (12)(b), the petitioner shall remit
payment for the drawing of the blood specimen and the analysis of the specimen
for the mandatory disease testing to the entity that draws the blood.
(b)  If the petitioner is an emergency medical services provider, the agency
which employs the emergency medical services provider shall remit payment for
the drawing of the blood specimen and the analysis of the specimen for the
mandatory disease testing to the entity that draws the blood.
(13)  The entity that draws the blood shall cause the blood and the payment
for the analysis of the specimen to be delivered to the Department of Health
for analysis.
(14)  If the individual is incarcerated, the incarcerating authority shall
either draw the blood specimen or shall pay the expenses of having the
individual's blood drawn.
